Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2365.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LAKE MINNETONKA SHORELINE RESTORATION.new text end new text begin $102,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the clean water fund to the Board of Soil and Water Resources for a grant to the city of Wayzata to improve water quality in Lake Minnetonka by restoring shoreline, adding native vegetation and pollinator habitat, and upgrading stormwater detention basins along the lake. new text end